languages/apertium-nog/tests/ger.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../nog.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../nog.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] verb stems with front vowels":
    туьз<v><tv><ger><nom> : туьзуьв
    буьги<v><tv><ger><nom> : буьгуьв

  "[twol] verb stems with back vowels":
    бол<v><iv><ger><nom> : болув
    окы<v><tv><ger><nom> : окув
    ата<v><tv><ger><nom> : атав
    яша<v><iv><ger><nom> : яшав

  "[twol] some case forms of <ger>":
    яша<v><iv><ger><dat> : яшавга
